Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.700.020

List of statewide high-demand programs—Definitions.

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the workforce training and education coordinating board, the Washington state apprenticeship and training council, and the state board for community and technical colleges, shall develop a list of statewide high-demand programs for secondary career and technical education. The list shall be developed using the high-demand list maintained by workforce development councils in consultation with the employment security department, and the high employer demand programs of study identified by the workforce training and education coordinating board. Local school districts may recommend additional high-demand programs in consultation with local career and technical education advisory committees by submitting evidence of local high demand.

(2) As used in this section and in RCW 28A.700.040, 28A.700.050, and 28A.700.060, and *section 307 of this act:

(a) "High-demand program" means a career and technical education program that prepares students for either a high employer demand program of study or a high-demand occupation, or both.

(b) "High employer demand program of study" means an apprenticeship or an undergraduate or graduate certificate or degree program in which the number of students per year prepared for employment from in-state programs is substantially fewer than the number of projected job openings per year in that field, either statewide or in a substate region.

(c) "High-demand occupation" means an occupation with a substantial number of current or projected employment opportunities.

[ 2012 c 229 s 802; 2008 c 170 s 102.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Section 307 of this act was vetoed.

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.